Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Article 21. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 33-13-601.
Courts of inquiry.

Courts of inquiry to investigate any matter may be convened by the Governor or by any other person designated by the Governor for that purpose, or any person authorized to convene a general court-martial by this code, whether or not the persons involved have requested such an inquiry.

A court of inquiry consists of three (3) or more commissioned officers. For each court of inquiry the convening authority shall also appoint counsel for the court.

Any person subject to this code whose conduct is subject to inquiry shall be designated as a party. Any person subject to this code or employed in the division of military affairs who has a direct interest in the subject of inquiry has the right to be designated as a party upon request to the court. Any person designated as a party shall be given due notice and has the right to be present, to be represented by counsel, to cross-examine witnesses and to introduce evidence.

Members of a court of inquiry may be challenged by a party, but only for cause stated to the court.

The members, counsel, the reporter and interpreters of courts of inquiry shall take an oath or affirmation to faithfully perform their duties.

Witnesses may be summoned to appear and testify and be examined before courts of inquiry, as provided for courts-martial.

Courts of inquiry shall make findings of fact but may not express opinions or make recommendations unless required to do so by the convening authority.

Each court of inquiry shall keep a record of its proceedings, which shall be authenticated by the signatures of the president and counsel for the court and forwarded to the convening authority. If the record cannot be authenticated by the counsel for the court, it shall be signed by a member in lieu of the counsel.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-119; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 119; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 89, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-603.
Authority to administer oaths.

The following members of the state military forces may administer oaths for the purpose of legal assistance and military administration, including military justice, and they have the general powers of a notary public in the performance of all notarial acts to be executed by members of the state military forces, their spouses and dependents wherever they may be:

The State Judge Advocate and all judge advocates;

All adjutants, assistant adjutants, acting adjutants and personnel adjutants;

All military judges;

All summary courts-martial;

All administrative officers, assistant administrative officers and acting administrative officers;

All staff judge advocates and legal officers and acting or assistant staff judge advocates and legal officers; and

All other persons designated by regulations of the state military forces or by statute.

The following persons on state active duty may administer oaths necessary in the performance of their duties:

The president, military judge, trial counsel and assistant trial counsel for all general and special courts-martial;

The president, counsel for the court and recorder of any court of inquiry;

All officers designated to take a deposition;

All persons detailed to conduct an investigation;

All recruiting officers; and

All other persons designated by regulations of the state military forces or by statute.

No fee may be paid to or received by any person for the performance of any notarial act herein authorized.

The signature without seal of any such person acting as notary, together with the title of his office, is prima facie evidence of his authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-120; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 120; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 90; Laws, 1989, ch. 473, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 33-13-605.
Complaints of wrongs.

Any member of the state military forces who believes himself wronged by his commanding officer and who, upon due application to that commanding officer, is refused redress, may complain to any superior commissioned officer, who shall examine into the complaint and take proper measures for redressing the wrong complained of; and he shall, as soon as possible, send the Adjutant General a true statement of that complaint with the proceedings had thereon.

When an action or proceeding of any nature shall be commenced in any court, other than a military court, by any person against any member of the state military forces for any act done, or cause, ordered or directed to be done in the line of duty, as determined by a finding of fact made by a court of inquiry under Section 33-13-601 of this code, while such member was on active state duty, all expenses of representation in such action or proceeding, including fees of witnesses, depositions, court costs and all costs for transcripts of records or other documents that might be needed during trial or appeal shall be paid as provided in this code. When any action or proceeding of any type is brought, as described in this subsection, the Adjutant General, upon the written request of the member involved, shall designate the state judge advocate, a judge advocate or a legal officer of the state military forces to represent such member. Judge advocates or legal officers performing duty under this subsection will be called to state active duty by order of the Governor. If the military legal services, noted above, are not available, then the Adjutant General, after consultation with the state judge advocate and member involved, shall contract with a competent private attorney to conduct such representation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-121; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 121; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 91, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-607.
Redress of injuries to property.

Whenever complaint is made to any commanding officer that willful damage has been done to the property of any person or that his property has been wrongfully taken by members of the state military forces, he may, subject to such regulations as the Governor may prescribe, convene a board to investigate the complaint. The board shall consist of from one (1) to three (3) commissioned officers, and for the purpose of that investigation, it has power to summon witnesses and examine them upon oath or affirmation, to receive depositions or other documentary evidence, and to assess the damages sustained against the responsible parties. The assessment of damages made by the board is subject to the approval of the commanding officer, and the amount approved by him shall be charged against the pay of the offenders. The order of the commanding officer directing charges herein authorized is conclusive, except as provided in subsection (3), on any disbursing officer for the payment by him to the injured parties of the damages so assessed and approved.

If the offenders cannot be ascertained, but the organization or detachment to which they belong is known, charges totaling the amount of damages assessed and approved may be paid to the injured parties from the military funds of the units of the state military forces to which the offenders belonged.

Any person subject to this code who is accused of causing willful damage to property has the right to be represented by counsel, to summon witnesses in his behalf, and to cross-examine those appearing against him. The counsel mentioned herein will be military counsel, provided by the commanding officer instituting this injury. The accused may also employ civilian counsel of his own choosing at his own expense. He has the right of appeal to the next higher commander.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-122; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 122; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-609.
Immunity for action of military courts.

No accused may bring an action or proceeding seeking damages against the convening authority, a member of a military court or board convened under this code, any military counsel taking part in such court or board action or appeal, or, any person acting under this code’s authority or reviewing its proceedings because of the approval, imposition or execution of any sentence or the imposition or collection of a fine or penalty, or the execution of any process or mandate of a military court or board convened under this code.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-123; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 123; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 93, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-611.
Delegation of authority by the Governor.

The Governor may delegate any authority vested in him under this code, and may provide for the subdelegation of any such authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-124; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 124; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 94, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-613.
Execution of process and sentence.

In the state military forces not in federal service, the processes and sentences of its courts-martial shall be executed by the civil officers prescribed by the laws of the state.

When the sentence of a court-martial, as approved and ordered executed, adjudges confinement, and the convening authority has approved the same in whole or in part, the reviewing authority, or the commanding officer for the time being, as the case may be, shall issue a warrant of commitment to the sheriff of the county in which such court-martial was held, where the offense was committed, or of the county in which a confinement facility as designated by the Adjutant General is located, directing such sheriff to take the body of the person so sentenced and confine him in the county jail of such county for the period named in such sentence, as approved, or until he may be directed to release him by proper authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-125; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 125; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 95; Laws, 2016, ch. 404, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 33-13-615.
Process of military courts.

Military courts may issue any process or mandate necessary to carry into effect their powers. Such a court may issue subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum and enforce by attachment attendance of witnesses and production of books and records, when it is sitting within the state and the witnesses, books and records sought are also so located.

Process and mandates may be issued by summary courts-martial, provost courts, military judges, or the president of other military courts and may be directed to and may be executed by the marshals of the military court or any peace officer and shall be in such form as may be prescribed by regulations issued under this code.

All officers to whom process or mandates may be directed shall execute them and make return of their acts thereunder according to the requirements of those documents. Except as otherwise specifically provided in this code, no such officer may demand or require payment of any fee or charge for receiving, executing, or returning such a process or mandate or for any service in connection therewith.

The president of any court-martial, any military judge and any summary court officer, shall have authority to issue, under his hand, in the name of the State of Mississippi, directed to any sheriff or constable, whose duty it shall be to serve or execute the same in the same manner in which like process is served or executed when issued by a magistrate, all necessary process, subpoenas, attachments, warrants of arrest, and warrants of commitment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-126; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 126; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 96, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-617.
Payment of fines, costs, and disposition thereof.

All fines and costs imposed by general court-martial shall be paid to the officer ordering such court, and/or to the officer commanding for the time being, and by said officer, within five (5) days from the receipt thereof, paid to the Adjutant General, who shall disburse the same as he may see fit for military purposes.

All fines and costs imposed by special or summary court-martial shall be paid to the officer ordering the court, or the officer commanding for the time being, and by such officer, within five (5) days from the receipt thereof, paid to the Adjutant General to be placed to the credit of the military unit fund of the unit of which the person fined was a member when the fine was imposed.

When the sentence of a court-martial adjudges a fine and cost against any person, and such fine and cost has not been fully paid within ten (10) days after the confirmation thereof, the convening authority shall issue a warrant of commitment directed to the sheriff of the county in which the court-martial was held or where the offense was committed, directing him to take the body of the person so convicted and confine him in the county jail for one (1) day for any fine not exceeding One Dollar ($1.00) and one (1) additional day for every dollar above that sum.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-127; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 127; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 97, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-619.
Presumption of jurisdiction.

The jurisdiction of the military courts and boards established by this code shall be presumed and the burden of proof rests on any person seeking to oust those courts or boards of jurisdiction in any action or proceeding.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-128; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 128, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-621.
Witness expenses.

Persons subpoenaed or required to appear as witnesses before military courts shall be entitled to compensation and reimbursement for travel expenses to the same extent permitted such witnesses appearing in criminal proceedings before the circuit courts of this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-129; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 129; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 98, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-623.
Arrest, bonds, laws applicable.

When charges against any person in the military service of this state are made or referred to a convening authority authorized to convene a court-martial for the trial of such person, and a convening authority, believing that such charges can be sustained, and has reason to believe that the person so charged will not appear for trial, or intends to flee from justice, a convening authority may issue a warrant of arrest to the sheriff or any constable of the county in which the person charged resides, or wherein he is supposed to be, commanding the sheriff or constable to take the body of the person so charged and confine him in jail until such time as his case may be finally disposed of; and the sheriff or constable, on the order of the convening authority, shall bring the person so charged before the court-martial for trial, or turn him over to whomever the order may direct, the convening authority issuing the warrant of arrest, shall endorse thereon the amount of bail to be required; and it shall be a violation of duty on the part of any sheriff or constable to permit a person so committed to remain out of jail, except that he may, when such person desires it, permit him to give bail in the sum endorsed on the warrant, conditioned for his appearance, from time to time, before such court-martial as he may be ordered for trial, and until his case is finally disposed of, or until such time as he may surrender to the sheriff or constable as directed by the convening authority of the court-martial before which he may be ordered for trial.

Upon the failure of any person, who has been admitted to bail conditioned for his appearance for trial before a court-martial, or upon failure of any person admitted to bail to appear as a witness in any case before a court-martial, as conditioned in the bail bond of any such person, the court-martial shall certify the fact of such failure to so appear to the convening authority or to the officer commanding for the time being, as the case may be; and such officer shall cause a judge advocate, district or county attorney to file suit therefor.

The rules laid down in the criminal procedural statutes of this state relating to the giving of bail, the amount of bail, the number of sureties, the persons who may be sureties, the property exempt from liability, the responsibility of parties to the same and all other rules of a general nature not inconsistent with this law are applicable to bail taken as provided in this code.

A warrant of arrest issued by a convening authority to order a court-martial, and all subpoenas and other process issued by courts-martial and courts of inquiry shall extend to every part of the state.

When any lawful process, issued by the proper officer of any court-martial, comes to the hands of any sheriff or constable, he shall perform the usual duties of such officer and perform all acts and duties by this code imposed or authorized to be performed by any sheriff or constable. Failure of any sheriff or constable to perform the duties required by this code shall be misdemeanor offenses punishable by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) and by confinement of not less than six (6) months and not more than twelve (12) months in jail.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-130; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 130; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 99, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-625.
Expenses of administration.

The Adjutant General shall have authority to pay all expenses incurred in the administration of state military justice, including the expenses of courts-martial and expenses incurred under Sections 33-13-327, 33-13-417, 33-13-605 and 33-13-621 of this code, from any funds appropriated to the Mississippi Military Department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-131; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 131; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 100, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-627.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Mississippi Code of Military Justice.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-132; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 132; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 101, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§§ 33-13-629 and 33-13-631.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 362, § 102, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§33-13-629. [Codes, 1942, § 8529-133; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 133]

§33-13-631. [Codes, 1942, § 8529-134; laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 134]